Illinois, session 104th, HB3602.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Veterans' Affairs Act is 5amended by changing Section 2.01 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 2805/2.01)  (from Ch. 126 1/2, par. 67.01)7    Sec. 2.01. Veterans Home admissions. 8    (a) Any honorably discharged veteran is entitled to 9admission to an Illinois Veterans Home if the applicant meets 10the requirements of this Section.11    (b) The veteran must:12        (1) have served in the armed forces of the United 13    States at least 1 day in World War II, the Korean Conflict, 14    the Viet Nam Campaign, or the Persian Gulf Conflict 15    between the dates recognized by the U.S. Department of 16    Veterans Affairs or between any other present or future 17    dates recognized by the U.S. Department of Veterans 18    Affairs as a war period, or have served in a hostile fire 19    environment and has been awarded a campaign or 20    expeditionary medal signifying his or her service, for 21    purposes of eligibility for domiciliary or nursing home 22    care;23        (2) have served and been honorably discharged or   HB3602- 2 -LRB104 11268 KTG 21352 b1    retired from the armed forces of the United States for a 2    service connected disability or injury, for purposes of 3    eligibility for domiciliary or nursing home care;4        (3) have served as an enlisted person at least 90 days 5    on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, 6    excluding service on active duty for training purposes 7    only, and entered active duty before September 8, 1980, 8    for purposes of eligibility for domiciliary or nursing 9    home care;10        (4) have served as an officer at least 90 days on 11    active duty in the armed forces of the United States, 12    excluding service on active duty for training purposes 13    only, and entered active duty before October 17, 1981, for 14    purposes of eligibility for domiciliary or nursing home 15    care;16        (5) have served on active duty in the armed forces of 17    the United States for 24 months of continuous service or 18    more, excluding active duty for training purposes only, 19    and enlisted after September 7, 1980, for purposes of 20    eligibility for domiciliary or nursing home care;21        (6) have served as a reservist in the armed forces of 22    the United States or the National Guard and the service 23    included being called to federal active duty, excluding 24    service on active duty for training purposes only, and who 25    completed the term, for purposes of eligibility for 26    domiciliary or nursing home care;  HB3602- 3 -LRB104 11268 KTG 21352 b1        (7) have been discharged for reasons of hardship or 2    released from active duty due to a reduction in the United 3    States armed forces prior to the completion of the 4    required period of service, regardless of the actual time 5    served, for purposes of eligibility for domiciliary or 6    nursing home care; or 7        (8) have served in the National Guard or Reserve 8    Forces of the United States and completed 20 years of 9    satisfactory service, be otherwise eligible to receive 10    reserve or active duty retirement benefits, and have been 11    an Illinois resident for at least one year before applying 12    for admission for purposes of eligibility for domiciliary 13    care only.14    (c) The veteran must have service accredited to the State 15of Illinois or have been a resident of this State for one year 16immediately preceding the date of application.17    (d) For admission to the Illinois Veterans Homes at Anna 18and Quincy, the veteran must have developed a disability by 19disease, wounds, or otherwise and because of the disability be 20incapable of earning a living.21    (e) For admission to the Illinois Veterans Homes at 22Chicago, LaSalle, and Manteno, the veteran must have developed 23a disability by disease, wounds, or otherwise and, for 24purposes of eligibility for nursing home care, require nursing 25care because of the disability.26    (f) An individual who served during a time of conflict as   HB3602- 4 -LRB104 11268 KTG 21352 b1set forth in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Section 2has preference over all other qualifying candidates, for 3purposes of eligibility for domiciliary or nursing home care 4at any Illinois Veterans Home. 5    (g) A veteran or spouse, once admitted to an Illinois 6Veterans Home facility, is considered a resident for 7interfacility purposes. 8    (h) A non-veteran spouse shall only have the same priority 9for admission to a Veterans Home as a veteran if the 10non-veteran spouse and his or her veteran spouse are admitted 11at the same time to live together at the Veterans Home. 12    (i) No veteran who otherwise meets the requirements of 13this Section shall be denied admission to a Veterans Homes on 14account of a prior conviction for a crime of violence as 15defined in Section 2 of the Crime Victims Compensation Act if 16the veteran completed his or her sentence 20 or more years 17prior to applying for admission into the Veterans Home. 18(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 99-314, eff. 8-7-15; 1999-642, eff. 7-28-16; 100-392, eff. 8-25-17; 100-942, eff. 201-1-19.)